Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3807
Department of Labor; enforcement and implementation powers; rules and regulations.

(1) The department shall be responsible for implementation and enforcement of the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the act.

(2) The Commissioner of Labor may subpoena records and witnesses related to the enforcement of the act. The commissioner or his or her agent may inspect all related records and gather testimony on any matter relative to the enforcement of the act when the information sought is relevant to a lawful investigative purpose and is reasonable in scope.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, § 7.